District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-1305

Real property tax assignment; sale and transfers — Applicability of changed interest rates.

Repealed.

History

June 25, 1938, 52 Stat. 1201, ch. 702, § 9(d)
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 504(j), 48 DCR 334

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-1305.
1973 Ed., § 47-1004.

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 4(l) of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-8, June 13, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 5916).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 4(j)(2) of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-22, March 16, 2001, 48 DCR 2706).